Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
State and Local Fiscal Coordination

6.950.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

6.955

to

6.975

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Fiscal note” means a realistic statement of the estimated effect on expenditures or revenue of local government in implementing or complying with any proposed act of the General Assembly whether filed in regular session or prefiled during the interim, order, or administrative law.

“Local government” means cities, counties or urban-county governments.

“State mandate” means any state constitutional, legislative, or executive law or order which requires any local government to establish, expand, or modify its activities, programs, or structure in such a way as to affect expenditures from local revenues.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 215, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2003, ch. 89, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

6.955.
Fiscal note required for bill or resolution of Legislature or executive order relating to local government.

No bill or resolution which relates to any aspect of local government or any service provided thereby shall be voted on by either chamber of the General Assembly unless a fiscal note has been prepared and attached to the bill pursuant to KRS

6.960

, except that, if in the chamber in which the bill is being considered, two-thirds (2/3) of the members elected vote to waive the fiscal note requirement, no note shall be required. The fiscal note waiver shall be certified by the clerk of the chamber in which the bill is being considered, and such certification shall be attached to the bill. Although waived in one chamber, a fiscal note shall be required when the bill goes to the other chamber unless a majority of the members elected to such chamber vote to waive the fiscal note requirement.

An executive order which relates to any aspect of local government or any service provided thereby shall not be issued unless a fiscal note has been prepared and made a part of the order pursuant to KRS

6.960

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 215, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 2003, ch. 89, § 2, effective June 24, 2003.

6.960.
Preparation of fiscal note for bill introduced in General Assembly or executive order.

The director of the Legislative Research Commission shall have the fiscal note prepared by the Legislative Research Commission or by other departments or agencies of state government for any bill introduced before the General Assembly which relates to any aspect of local government or any service provided thereby. Departments or agencies of state government so requested by the director shall comply with the request within seven (7) working days of receipt. The fiscal note shall be filed with the clerk in the chamber of the General Assembly in which the bill was introduced and attached to each copy of the bill.

The secretary of finance shall have the fiscal note prepared by the Finance and Administration Cabinet or by other departments or agencies of state government for any order promulgated by an executive department or agency which relates to any aspect of local government or any service provided thereby. The director of the Legislative Research Commission shall determine the form of such notes. The secretary may request the advice or assistance of the Legislative Research Commission in the preparation of the fiscal note. The fiscal note shall be attached to each copy of the order.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 215, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 2003, ch. 89, § 3, effective June 24, 2003.

6.965.
Contents of fiscal note — State mandate determination — Copies to be furnished to local officials.

A fiscal note shall state whether the bill or order is determined to be a state mandate. Such determination shall be made by the director of the Legislative Research Commission except as provided by subsection (2) of this section. If the bill or order is a state mandate, the note shall contain an estimate of the effect the law will have on expenditures or revenues of local government for the first full fiscal year the law is to be in effect.

The director, at his discretion, may seek a certification from the Attorney General on the question of whether a bill or order constitutes a state mandate. The Attorney General shall, within seven (7) working days from receipt of the request, certify to the director that the bill or order is or is not a state mandate.

If any bill or order is amended after the preparation of the fiscal note, it shall be resubmitted to the person responsible for preparation of the note who shall reevaluate the bill or order as amended and change the fiscal note in accordance therewith.

Copies of the fiscal note shall be furnished by the Legislative Research Commission to any local official upon written request.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 215, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 2003, ch. 89, § 4, effective June 24, 2003.

6.970.
Fiscal note information system on local government’s financial condition.

The Legislative Research Commission shall be responsible for compiling, analyzing, and collecting fiscal and other information from local governments necessary for the preparation of fiscal notes. An information system shall be developed and designed to provide sufficient continuing information on the financial condition of local government which can be readily utilized for the preparation of fiscal notes. In the development of this information system, the Legislative Research Commission shall:

Compile, analyze, and maintain in a unified, concise, and orderly form, information on the nature and impact of existing state mandates and state programs which involve the distribution of funds to local government; and

Continuously compile, analyze, and maintain fiscal and other relevant information which is required by statute or regulation to be prepared by local governments.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 215, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 27, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

6.975.
Requests for information from local government.

The Legislative Research Commission may submit to any unit of local or state government any request for information concerning local fiscal management and fiscal conditions. Each unit shall be required to comply with such requests. Where information sought by the Legislative Research Commission is required by law to be filed with the county clerk or state agency, the Legislative Research Commission shall direct all requests to the appropriate county clerk or state agency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 215, § 6, effective July 15, 1982.